Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.56.010

"Bank" and "directors" defined.

In this chapter the word "bank" includes savings banks, mutual savings banks, and trust companies, and "directors" shall include trustees.

[ 1955 c 33 s 30.56.010. Prior: 1933 c 49 s 2; RRS s 3293-2. Formerly RCW 30.56.010.]